Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2887.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Apache county; Concho-Snowflake Highway pavement rehabilitation The sum of $7,390,400 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to Apache county for Concho-Snowflake Highway pavement rehabilitation between U.S. Route 180A and milepost 7.5.